Illinois, session 104th, SB2455.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Urban and Community Forestry Assistance Act 5is amended by changing Sections 2, 4, 5, and 6 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 735/2)  (from Ch. 96 1/2, par. 9302)7    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 8context otherwise requires, the following terms have the 9meanings ascribed to them in this Section:10    "Applicant" means either (i) a unit of local government or 11(ii) an . An Illinois chartered not-for-profit corporation 12that is working to assist units of local government or the 13Department in meeting the goals of this Act as defined in the 14General Not-For-Profit Corporation Act of 1986 can be a 15co-applicant with a unit of local government.16    "Department" means the Department of Natural Resources.17    "Director" means the Director of Natural Resources.18    "Not-for-profit corporation" means an Illinois chartered 19not-for-profit corporation as defined in the General Not For 20Profit Corporation Act of 1986.21    "Public trees" means trees that are owned by a unit of 22local government.23    "Public tree inventory" means an inventory, by a unit of   SB2455 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 12212 BDA 22317 b1local government, that is an assessment of the public trees 2located within its boundaries. This inventory shall include 3the collected data regarding the public trees and forests of 4the unit of local government and shall provide recommended 5action items to enable or enhance the future management of the 6trees and forests. Such recommendations may include the 7establishment, conservation, protection, and maintenance of 8public trees and forests.9    "Underserved or disadvantaged" means a community, county, 10or portion thereof that is determined by the USDA Forest 11Service for federal grant purposes to be underserved or 12disadvantaged. 13    "Urban and / Community Forestry Proposal" means a written 14proposal documenting proposed action to be implemented to 15complete a specific project approved by the Department under 16this Act.17    "Urban and / Community Forestry Management Plan" means a 18comprehensive document used to guide urban and / community 19forestry management decisions that is based on a public tree 20inventory that is less than 10 years old. It may contain 21contains information on history, policy, budget, inventory 22analysis of the forest ecosystem resources and management 23prescriptions, but, at a minimum, must contain and other 24information prescribed by rules adopted promulgated by the 25Department.26(Source: P.A. 89-172, eff. 1-1-96; 89-445, eff. 2-7-96.)   SB2455 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 12212 BDA 22317 b1    (30 ILCS 735/4)  (from Ch. 96 1/2, par. 9304)2    Sec. 4. Duties of Department. The Department shall:3    (a) Promote the development of Urban and Community 4Forestry plans and programs in communities of this State to 5enhance for the establishment, management, and conservation of 6public trees located within the urban/community forest with 7units of local government.8    (b) Provide technical expertise, assistance, guidance, 9planning, and analysis to grant recipients for programs, 10projects, and other works related to urban and / community 11forestry.12    (c) Seek and review for approval acceptable 13Urban/Community Forestry Proposals submitted by applicants 14within the State.15    (d) Provide oversight and assistance to units of local 16government and to grant recipients in managing urban and 17community forestry related grant proposals and programs 18regarding urban/community forest management, such as tree 19care, disease and insect problems, and tree planting and 20maintenance.21    (e) Provide urban and community forestry information and 22guidance to the Illinois Council on Forestry Development 23Council and other State appropriate agencies and units of 24local government seeking urban and community forestry 25information or guidance with regard to urban/community   SB2455 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 12212 BDA 22317 b1forestry.2(Source: P.A. 89-172, eff. 1-1-96.) 3    (30 ILCS 735/5)  (from Ch. 96 1/2, par. 9305)4    Sec. 5. Application for assistance; forestry plan. 5    (a) Applicants may submit an Urban and / Community 6Forestry Proposal for assistance under the provisions of this 7Act. 8    (b) Requests for grant assistance shall include, but shall 9not be limited to, those activities that will implement or 10enhance:11        (1) current Illinois Forest Action Plan objectives;12        (2) local forestry program management objectives as 13    determined by an urban and community forestry management 14    plan;15        (3) tree canopy capacity in underserved and 16    disadvantaged areas of communities or counties; or17        (4) urban and community forest canopy in Illinois 18    communities and counties. a portion of the applicant's 19    forestry program or forestry management plan or will lead 20    to the development of a forestry management plan for the 21    unit of local government.22    (c) Multiple applicants may apply jointly for assistance 23under this Act, but payments shall be paid only in the manner 24prescribed by the Department in the grant award.25    (d) The Department shall evaluate the application and   SB2455 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 12212 BDA 22317 b1notify the applicant of the qualification or non-qualification 2of the application. The evaluation shall consider, among other 3factors, the effect of the proposal on each of the following: 4        (1) The facilitation of improvements to the quality of 5    the environment in Illinois forests, urban areas, and 6    green space areas within the applicant's jurisdiction 7    through the improved management and preservation of the 8    urban and / community forest resources for the common 9    good, health, welfare, and safety of the citizens of this 10    State. 11        (2) The creation of employment opportunities in tree 12    care, tree preservation, maintenance and related urban and 13    / community forestry activities. 14        (3) The improvement of human health, environmental 15    access, and Maximizing the potential of tree and 16    vegetative cover to reduce urban heat island effects and 17    in reducing energy consumption. 18        (4) The establishment and commitment to the management 19    and improvement of the forest resources of the community. 20        (5) An increased public awareness. 21        (6) Increased participation of local citizenry and 22    volunteers.23        (7) Increased assistance to underserved or 24    disadvantaged Illinois communities or counties. 25(Source: P.A. 89-172, eff. 1-1-96.)   SB2455 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 12212 BDA 22317 b1    (30 ILCS 735/6)  (from Ch. 96 1/2, par. 9306)2    Sec. 6. Grants; sources and amounts. Urban and / Community 3Forestry Assistance Grants shall be made available from 4appropriations from the General Revenue Fund, Illinois 5Forestry Development Fund, or other sources as appropriated by 6the General Assembly. All The grants shall be limited to 7projects for which the applicant will provide any costs or 8matching funds as required under the notice of funding 9opportunity for the grant for which they have applied at least 1050% of the cost. A single grant to a unit of local government 11shall not exceed 5% of the amount allocated for the grant 12program by the Department in the current fiscal year. The 13Department shall seek and obtain the advice of the Forestry 14Development Council with respect to awarding grants under this 15Section. 16    In the event that any unit of local government's 17contribution of the municipality's contribution to the payment 18of the program's cost of the program is to be made by 19contribution of in-kind in kind service, the application shall 20set forth in detail how such contribution will be made. 21In-kind contributions shall follow and meet all current 22federal and State grant requirements for in-kind contributions 23as set out in the grant award. 24    Units of local government may delegate program 25administration, including the receipt and expenditure of 26funds, to special boards by ordinance.  SB2455 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 12212 BDA 22317 b1(Source: P.A. 91-157, eff. 7-16-99.) 2    Section 10. The State Forest Act is amended by changing 3Section 2.1 as follows: 4    (525 ILCS 40/2.1)  (from Ch. 96 1/2, par. 5903)5    Sec. 2.1. The following described areas are designated as 6State forests:7        Big River State Forest in Henderson County;8        Sand Ridge State Forest in Mason County;9        Hidden Springs State Forest in Shelby County;10        Lowden-Miller State Forest in Ogle County;11        Sand Ridge State Forest in Mason County;12        Spoon River State Forest in Knox County; 13        Trail of Tears State Forest in Union County;14        Wildcat Hollow State Forest in Effingham County.15(Source: P.A. 78-817.)